Utah statutes.
78B-10a-106.   Governing provisions.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the parties, an arbitration proceeding conducted in accordance with this chapter shall be governed by Title 78B, Chapter 11, Utah Uniform Arbitration Act.

(2) (a)  Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure and Utah Rules of Evidence apply to arbitration proceedings.

(b)  The Utah Rules of Civil Procedure and the Utah Rules of Evidence shall be applied with the intent of concluding the claim in a timely and cost-efficient manner.

(c)  Discovery shall be conducted in accordance with Rules 26 through 37 of the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure and shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the district court in which the matter is filed.

(d)  Dispositive motions shall be filed, heard, and decided by the district court prior to the arbitration proceeding in accordance with the court's scheduling order.

